ru: Тип носовой перемычки: Регулируемая; Фиксированная; Сменная; Саморегулирующаяся; Другая
el: Τύπος γέφυρας μύτης: Ρυθμιζόμενη; Σταθερή; Εναλλάξιμη; Αυτορυθμιζόμενη; Άλλο
sv: Typ av näsbrygga: Justerbar; Fast; Utbytbar; Självjusterande; Övrigt
it: Tipo di ponte nasale: Regolabile; Fisso; Intercambiabile; Autoregolante; Altro
th: สันจมูก: ปรับได้; ตายตัว; ถอดเปลี่ยนได้; ปรับอัตโนมัติ; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 鼻橋類型: 可調式; 固定式; 可替換式; 自動調整式; 其他
es: Tipo de puente nasal: Ajustable; Fijo; Intercambiable; Autoajustable; Otro
en: Nose bridge type: Adjustable; Fixed; Interchangeable; Self adjusting; Other
ja: ノーズブリッジのタイプ: 調整可能; 固定; 交換可能; 自動調整; その他
fi: Nenäsillan tyyppi: Säädettävä; Kiinteä; Vaihdettava; Itsesäätyvä; Muu
pl: Typ mostka nosowego: Regulowany; Stały; Wymienny; Samoregulujący; Inne
ko: 코받침 유형: 조절 가능; 고정식; 교체 가능; 자동 조절; 기타
nb: Nesebrotype: Justerbar; Fast; Utskiftbar; Selvjusterende; Annet
hu: Orrnyereg típusa: Állítható; Rögzített; Cserélhető; Önbeálló; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ nosového mostíka: Nastaviteľný; Pevný; Vymeniteľný; Samočinne nastaviteľný; Iný
tr: Burun köprüsü tipi: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit; Değiştirilebilir; Kendiliğinden ayarlanan; Diğer
bg-BG: Тип на носовия мост: Регулируем; Фиксиран; Сменяем; Самонастройващ се; Друго
sl-SI: Vrsta nosnega mostička: Nastavljivo; Fiksno; Zamenljivo; Samonastavljivo; Drugo
hr-HR: Vrsta mosta za nos: Podesivo; Fiksno; Izmjenjivo; Samoprilagodljivo; Ostalo
fr: Type de pont nasal: Réglable; Fixe; Interchangeable; À réglage automatique; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul de punte nazală: Ajustabil; Fix; Interschimbabil; Cu autoajustare; Altele
pt-PT: Tipo de ponte nasal: Ajustável; Fixa; Intercambiável; Autoajustável; Outra
nl: Neusbrug type: Verstelbaar; Vast; Verwisselbaar; Zelfverstellend; Anders
zh-CN: 鼻梁架类型: 可调节; 固定; 可互换; 自适应调节; 其他
pt-BR: Ponte nasal tipo: Ajustável; Fixo; Intercambiável; Autoajustável; Outro
cs: Typ nosního můstku: Nastavitelný; Pevný; Vyměnitelný; Samonastavitelný; Ostatní
lt-LT: Nosies tiltelio tipas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuotas; Keičiamas; Savaime prisitaikantis; Kita
de: Typ des Nasenstegs: Anpassbar; Fixiert; Austauschbar; Selbstanpassend; Sonstiges
vi: Loại sống mũi: Có thể điều chỉnh; Cố định; Có thể thay thế; Tự điều chỉnh; Khác
da: Type af næsebro: Justerbar; Fast; Udskiftelig; Selvjusterende; Andet